Illinois, session 104th, SB1467.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 1-118.1, 2-106, 3-307, 3-701, 3-804, 67-603.5, and 7-605 and by adding Section 2-123.5 as follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/1-118.1)8    Sec. 1-118.1. Expanded-use antique vehicle.9    A motor vehicle that is more than 25 years of age or a bona 10fide replica thereof and which is registered and driven on the 11highways in accordance with Section 3-804.01. "Expanded-use 12antique vehicle" does not include a commercial vehicle, as 13defined under Section 1-111.8, or a farm truck, as defined 14under Section 3-815. 15(Source: P.A. 97-412, eff. 1-1-12.) 16    (625 ILCS 5/2-106)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 2-106)17    Sec. 2-106. Secretary of State to prescribe forms. 18    The Secretary of State shall prescribe or provide suitable 19forms of applications, certificates of title, registration 20cards, driver's licenses and such other forms requisite or 21deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this Act and 22any other laws pertaining to vehicles the enforcement and   SB1467 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09654 LNS 19720 b1administration of which are vested in the Secretary of State. 2Any entity or vendor providing services to or on behalf of the 3Secretary of State may also prescribe or provide suitable 4forms under this Section to the extent authorized by the 5Secretary of State and upon approval of the Secretary of 6State. 7(Source: P.A. 76-1586.) 8    (625 ILCS 5/2-123.5 new)9    Sec. 2-123.5. Confidentiality of highly restricted 10personal information contained in vehicle title and 11registration records. 12    (a) An individual's photograph or image, signature, social 13security number, personal email address, and medical or 14disability information as may be submitted to the Secretary of 15State for purposes of a vehicle title and registration 16application shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed, 17except as provided under this Section.18    (b) Except for medical or disability information and 19social security numbers, any information deemed confidential 20under subsection (a) may be disclosed to the following 21persons:22        (1) the individual to whom the application and 23    personal information pertains, upon written request of 24    that person;25        (2) officers and employees of the Secretary of State   SB1467 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09654 LNS 19720 b1    who have a need to have access to such personal 2    information for purposes related to vehicle title and 3    registration administration as authorized under this Code;4        (3) law enforcement officials for a civil or criminal 5    law enforcement investigation, except as restricted by 6    Section 6-110.3, Section 3.5 of the Uniform Interstate 7    Depositions and Discovery Act, or the Lawful Health Care 8    Activity Act; and9        (4) a person requesting disclosure of such information 10    pursuant to a court order directing the Secretary of State 11    to release the requested confidential information.12    (c) Medical or disability information deemed confidential 13under this Section may be disclosed as provided under 14subsection (j) of Section 2-123.15    (d) Social security numbers or any associated information 16obtained from the Social Security Administration deemed 17confidential under this Section may be disclosed as provided 18under subsection (h) of Section 2-123. 19    (625 ILCS 5/3-307)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-307)20    Sec. 3-307. Short term permit. The Secretary of State 21shall issue at no charge a short term permit to a licensed 22rebuilder for (i) any vehicle for which an application for a 23certificate of title for a rebuilt vehicle will be submitted 24or (ii) any vehicle which is or may have been salvaged has been 25made under this Article and which must be driven on the roads   SB1467 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09654 LNS 19720 b1and highways of this State to a place of inspection.2(Source: P.A. 84-1302; 84-1304.) 3    (625 ILCS 5/3-701)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-701)4    Sec. 3-701. Operation of vehicles without evidence of 5registration - Operation under mileage plates when odometer 6broken or disconnected. 7    (a) No person shall operate, nor shall an owner knowingly 8permit to be operated, except as provided in subsection (b) of 9this Section, a vehicle upon any highway unless there shall be 10attached thereto and displayed thereon when and as required by 11law, proper evidence of registration in Illinois, as follows:12        (1) A vehicle required to be registered in Illinois. A 13    current and valid Illinois registration sticker or 14    stickers and plate or plates or digital registration 15    sticker or stickers and digital plate or plates, or an 16    Illinois temporary registration permit, or a drive-away or 17    in-transit permit, issued therefor by the Secretary of 18    State.19        (2) A vehicle eligible for Reciprocity. A current and 20    valid reciprocal foreign registration plate or digital 21    registration plate or plates properly issued to such 22    vehicle or a temporary registration issued therefor, by 23    the reciprocal State, and, in addition, when required by 24    the Secretary, a current and valid Illinois Reciprocity 25    Permit or Prorate Decal issued therefor by the Secretary   SB1467 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09654 LNS 19720 b1    of State; or except as otherwise expressly provided for in 2    this Chapter.3        (3) A vehicle commuting for repairs in Illinois. A 4    dealer plate issued by a foreign state shall exempt a 5    vehicle from the requirements of this Section if the 6    vehicle is being operated for the purpose of transport to 7    a repair facility in Illinois to have repairs performed on 8    the vehicle displaying foreign dealer plates. The driver 9    of the motor vehicle bearing dealer plates shall provide a 10    work order or contract with the repair facility to a law 11    enforcement officer upon request. 12    (b) A person may operate or permit operation of a vehicle 13upon any highway a vehicle that has been properly registered 14but does not display a current and valid Illinois registration 15sticker or digital registration sticker if he or she has 16proof, in the form of a printed receipt from the Secretary, 17that he or she registered the vehicle before the previous 18registration's expiration but has not received a new 19registration sticker or digital registration sticker from the 20Secretary. This printed proof of registration is valid for 30 21days from the expiration of the previous registration 22sticker's or digital registration sticker's date or 30 days 23from the purchase date of the new registration sticker or 24digital registration sticker, whichever occurs later. 25    (c) No person shall operate, nor shall any owner knowingly 26permit to be operated, any vehicle of the second division for   SB1467 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09654 LNS 19720 b1which the owner has made an election to pay the mileage tax in 2lieu of the annual flat weight tax, at any time when the 3odometer of such vehicle is broken or disconnected, or is 4inoperable or not operating.5(Source: P.A. 101-395, eff. 8-16-19.) 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-804)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-804)7    Sec. 3-804. Antique vehicles. 8    (a) The owner of an antique vehicle may register such 9vehicle for a fee not to exceed $6 per registration year $13 10for a 2-year antique plate. The application for registration 11must be accompanied by an affirmation of the owner that such 12vehicle will be driven on the highway only for the purpose of 13going to and returning from an antique auto show or an 14exhibition, or for servicing or demonstration and also 15affirming that the mechanical condition, physical condition, 16brakes, lights, glass, and appearance of such vehicle is the 17same or as safe as originally equipped. The Secretary may, in 18his discretion, prescribe that antique vehicle plates be 19issued for a definite or an indefinite term, such term to 20correspond to the term of registration plates issued 21generally, as provided in Section 3-414.1. In no event may the 22registration fee for antique vehicles exceed $6 per 23registration year. Any person requesting antique plates under 24this Section may also apply to have vanity or personalized 25plates as provided under Section 3-405.1.  SB1467 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09654 LNS 19720 b1    (b) Any person who is the registered owner of an antique 2vehicle may display a historical Illinois-issued license plate 3that represents the model year of the vehicle, furnished by 4such person, in lieu of the current and valid Illinois antique 5vehicle plates issued thereto, provided that valid and current 6Illinois antique vehicle plates and registration card issued 7to such antique vehicle are simultaneously carried within such 8vehicle and are available for inspection.9(Source: P.A. 103-706, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-24-24.) 10    (625 ILCS 5/7-603.5)11    Sec. 7-603.5. Electronic verification of a liability 12insurance policy.13    (a) The Secretary may implement a program of electronic 14motor vehicle liability insurance policy verification for 15motor vehicles subject to Section 7-601 of this Code for the 16purpose of verifying whether or not the motor vehicle is 17insured. The development and implementation of the program 18shall be consistent with the standards and procedures of a 19nationwide organization whose primary membership consists of 20individual insurance companies and insurance trade 21associations. The program shall include, but is not limited 22to:23        (1) a requirement that an insurance company authorized 24    to sell motor vehicle liability insurance in this State 25    shall make available, in a format designated by the   SB1467 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 09654 LNS 19720 b1    Secretary that is consistent with a nationwide 2    organization whose primary membership consists of 3    individual insurance companies and insurance trade 4    organizations, to the Secretary for each motor vehicle 5    liability insurance policy issued by the company the 6    following information:7            (A) the name of the policy holder;8            (B) the make, model, year, and vehicle 9        identification number of the covered motor vehicle;10            (C) the policy number;11            (D) the policy effective date;12            (E) the insurance company's National Association 13        of Insurance Commissioner's number; and14            (F) any other information the Secretary deems 15        necessary to match an eligible vehicle with an 16        insurance policy;17        (2) a method for searching motor vehicle liability 18    insurance policies issued and in effect in this State by 19    using the information under paragraph (1) of this 20    subsection (a);21        (3) a requirement that at least twice per calendar 22    year, the Secretary shall verify the existence of a 23    liability insurance policy for every registered motor 24    vehicle subject to Section 7-601 of this Code; and if the 25    Secretary is unable to verify the existence of a liability 26    insurance policy, the Secretary shall, by U.S. mail or   SB1467 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 09654 LNS 19720 b1    electronic mail, send the vehicle owner a written notice 2    allowing the vehicle owner 30 calendar days to provide 3    proof of insurance on the date of attempted verification, 4    or to provide proof that the vehicle is no longer 5    operable;6        (4) a requirement that a vehicle owner who does not 7    provide proof of insurance or proof of an inoperable 8    vehicle within the 30 calendar days specified under 9    paragraph (3) of this subsection (a) shall be in violation 10    of Section 7-601 of this Code and the Secretary shall 11    suspend the vehicle's registration upon expiration of that 12    30 calendar days and the owner shall pay any applicable 13    reinstatement fees and shall provide proof of insurance 14    before the Secretary may reinstate the vehicle's 15    registration under Section 7-606 of this Code;16        (5) a requirement that if a vehicle owner provides 17    proof of insurance on the date of the attempted 18    verification under paragraph (3) of this subsection (1), 19    the Secretary may verify the vehicle owner's response by 20    furnishing necessary information to the insurance company. 21    Within 7 calendar days of receiving the information, the 22    insurance company shall confirm and notify the Secretary 23    the dates of the motor vehicle's insurance coverage. If 24    the insurance company does not confirm coverage for the 25    date of attempted verification, the Secretary shall 26    suspend the vehicle's registration and the owner of the   SB1467 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 09654 LNS 19720 b1    vehicle shall pay any applicable reinstatement fees and 2    shall provide proof of insurance before the Secretary may 3    reinstate the vehicle's registration under Section 7-606 4    of this Code;5        (6) a requirement that the Secretary may consult with 6    members of the insurance industry during the 7    implementation of the program, including, but not limited 8    to, during the drafting process for adopting any rules 9    that may be necessary to implement or manage an electronic 10    motor vehicle liability insurance policy verification 11    program; 12        (7) a requirement that commercial lines of automobile 13    insurance are excluded from the program, but may 14    voluntarily report insurance coverage to the State. 15    (b) In addition to the semi-annual verification of 16liability insurance under subsection (a) of this Section, the 17Secretary may select monthly verification for a motor vehicle 18owned or registered by a person:19        (1) whose motor vehicle registration during the 20    preceding 4 years has been suspended under Section 7-606 21    or 7-607 of this Code;22        (2) who, during the preceding 4 years, has been 23    convicted of violating Section 3-707, 3-708, or 3-710 of 24    this Code while operating a vehicle owned by another 25    person;26        (3) whose driving privileges have been suspended   SB1467 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 09654 LNS 19720 b1    during the preceding 4 years;2        (4) who, during the preceding 4 years, acquired 3    ownership of a motor vehicle while the registration of the 4    vehicle under the previous owner was suspended under 5    Section 7-606 or 7-607 of this Code; or6        (5) who, during the preceding 4 years, has received a 7    disposition of court supervision under subsection (c) of 8    Section 5-6-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections for a 9    violation of Section 3-707, 3-708, or 3-710 of this Code.10    (c) Nothing in this Section provides the Secretary with 11regulatory authority over insurance companies.12    (d) The Secretary may contract with a private contractor 13to carry out the Secretary's duties under this Section.14    (e) Any information collected, stored, maintained, or 15referred to under this Section shall be used solely for the 16purpose of verifying whether a registered motor vehicle meets 17the requirements of Section 7-601 of this Code and shall be 18exempt from a records request or from inspection and copying 19under the Freedom of Information Act. A request for release of 20verification of liability insurance policy information from 21the Secretary shall require a court order, subpoena, or the 22motor vehicle owner's approval.23    (f) An insurer identified by an electronic motor vehicle 24liability insurance policy program as insuring less than 1,000 25vehicles per year shall be exempt from the reporting 26requirements under subsection (a) of this Section.   SB1467 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 09654 LNS 19720 b1    (g) The Secretary may adopt any rules necessary to 2implement this Section.3(Source: P.A. 100-373, eff. 1-1-18.) 4    (625 ILCS 5/7-605)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 7-605)5    Sec. 7-605. Uninsured motor vehicles - notice. If the 6Secretary determines that an owner has registered or 7maintained the registration of a motor vehicle without a 8liability insurance policy in accordance with Section 7-601 of 9this Code, the Secretary shall notify the owner that such 10owner's vehicle registration shall be suspended 30 45 days 11after the date of the mailing of the notice unless the owner 12within 30 days furnishes proof of insurance in effect on the 13verification date, as prescribed by the Secretary, or provides 14an exemption from the mandatory insurance requirements as 15specified under subsection (b) of Section 7-601. 16Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 17giving of notice by mail under this Section or Section 7-603.5 18shall be deemed complete upon the deposit of that notice in the 19mail and the 30-day notice period shall begin upon deposit.20(Source: P.A. 86-149.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.